Utah statutes.
78B-6-514.   Payment of award -- Bond from railroad to secure fencing.
The plaintiff shall, within 30 days after final judgment, pay the sum of money
assessed; and, if the plaintiff is a railroad company, it shall also execute
to the defendant a bond, with sureties, to be determined and approved by the
court or judge, conditioned that the plaintiff will build proper fences within
six months from the time the railroad is built on or over the land taken.  In
an action on the bond all damages sustained and the cost of the construction
of fences may be recovered.
